Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5721
Employer, defined.

Employer means a person, nonprofit entity, sole proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, firm, trust, association, organization, or other business entity, including retail establishments where goods or services are sold, who or which employs one or more employees.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 6.